Hawaii statutes.
[§269-27.3] Preferential renewable energy
rates; agricultural activities. It is the policy of the State to promote
the long-term viability of agriculture by establishing mechanisms that provide
for preferential rates for the purchase of renewable energy produced in
conjunction with agricultural activities. The public utilities commission
shall have the authority to establish preferential rates for the purchase of
renewable energy produced in conjunction with agricultural activities.

Upon receipt of a bona fide request for
preferential rates for the purchase of renewable energy produced in conjunction
with agricultural activities, and proof that the renewable energy is produced
in conjunction with agricultural activities, a public utility shall forward the
request for preferential rates to the public utilities commission for approval.
[L 2009, c 185, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next